District of Columbia statutes.
1-128

Severability.

If any provisions or section of this measure, or the application thereof, shall in any circumstances be held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the provisions or applications.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 9, 27 DCR 4732

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-118.